Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 4. Merger, Consolidation, and Disposition of Assets.

Sec. 10.20.216.
Merger.

Two or more domestic nonprofit corporations may merge into one of the two or more corporations under a plan of merger approved in the manner provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.221.
Procedure for merger.

The board of directors of each corporation shall, by resolution, approve a plan of merger setting out

the names of the corporations proposing to merge and the name of the corporation into which they propose to merge, which is hereafter referred to as the surviving corporation;

the terms and conditions of the proposed merger;

a statement of changes in the articles of incorporation of the surviving corporation caused by the merger;

other provisions with respect to the merger considered necessary or desirable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.226.
Consolidation.

Two or more domestic corporations may consolidate into a new corporation under a plan of consolidation approved in the manner provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.231.
Procedure for consolidation.

The board of directors of each corporation shall, by a resolution, approve a plan of consolidation setting out

the names of the corporations proposing to consolidate, and the name of the new corporation into which they propose to consolidate, which is hereafter referred to as the new corporation;

the terms and conditions of the proposed consolidation;

all of the statements with respect to the new corporation required to be set out in articles of incorporation for corporations organized under this chapter;

other provisions with respect to the consolidation considered necessary or desirable.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.236.
Adoption of plan of merger or consolidation.

A plan of merger or consolidation shall be adopted in the manner set out in this section.

If the members of a merging or consolidating corporation are entitled to vote, the board of directors of the corporation shall adopt a resolution approving the proposed plan and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written notice setting forth the proposed plan or a summary shall be given to each member entitled to vote at the meeting within the time and in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of members. The proposed plan shall be adopted upon receiving at least two-thirds of the votes which members present at the meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.

If a merging or consolidating corporation has no members, or no members entitled to vote, a plan of merger or consolidation shall be adopted at a meeting of the board of directors of the corporation upon receiving the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, this section was reorganized to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes. The former introductory clause was designated as subsection (a) and minor word changes were made to reflect the reorganization. Former paragraphs (1) and (2) were redesignated as subsections (b) and (c) respectively.

Sec. 10.20.241.
Abandonment of plan of merger or consolidation.

After approval by a vote of the members, or in the case of a corporation with no members or no members entitled to vote, after approval by its board of directors, of each corporation, and before the filing of the articles of merger or consolidation, the merger or consolidation may be abandoned under provisions, if any, set out in the plan of merger or consolidation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.246.
Execution of articles of merger or consolidation.

Upon approval of the plan of merger or consolidation, articles of merger or articles of consolidation shall be executed in duplicate by each corporation by its president or a vice-president and its secretary or an assistant secretary.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 32 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.20.251.
Contents of articles of merger or consolidation.

The articles of merger or consolidation must set out

the plan of merger or the plan of consolidation;

if the members of any merging or consolidating corporation are entitled to vote, as to each such corporation

a statement setting out the date of the meeting of members at which the plan was adopted, that a quorum was present at the meeting, and that the plan received at least two-thirds of the votes which members present at the meeting or represented by proxy were entitled to cast; or

a statement that the plan was adopted by a consent in writing signed by all members entitled to vote;

if a merging or consolidating corporation has no members, or no members entitled to vote, as to each corporation a statement of this fact, the date of the meeting of the board of directors at which the plan was adopted and a statement of the fact that the plan received the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.256.
Filing of articles of merger or consolidation with commissioner.

Duplicate originals of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation shall be delivered to the commissioner. Upon finding that the articles conform to law, the commissioner shall, when all fees prescribed in this chapter have been paid,

endorse on each duplicate original the word “filed,” and the date of the filing;

file one duplicate original in the commissioner’s office;

issue a certificate of merger or a certificate of consolidation and affix the other duplicate original to it.

The certificate of merger or certificate of consolidation, together with the duplicate original of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation affixed shall be returned to the surviving or new corporation or its representative.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.261.
Effective date and effect of merger or consolidation.

Upon the issuance of the certificate of merger or the certificate of consolidation, the merger or consolidation becomes effective.

Merger or consolidation has the following effect:

the merging or consolidating corporations are a single corporation, which, in the case of a merger, is the corporation designated in the plan of merger as the surviving corporation, and, in the case of a consolidation, is the new corporation provided for in the plan of consolidation;

the separate existence of the corporations, except the surviving or new corporation, ceases;

the surviving or new corporation has the rights, privileges, immunities and powers and is subject to the duties and liabilities of a corporation organized under this chapter;

the surviving or new corporation possesses the rights, privileges, immunities and franchises, public and private, of the merging or consolidating corporations; all real, personal and mixed property, and all debts due, including subscriptions to shares, and all other choses in action, and every other interest of or belonging to or due to each of the corporations are transferred to and vested in the surviving or new corporation; the title to real estate, or interest in real estate, vested in the corporations does not revert nor is it in any way impaired because of the merger or consolidation;

the surviving or new corporation is liable for the liabilities and obligations of each of the corporations merged or consolidated; a claim existing or action or proceeding pending by or against the corporations may be prosecuted as if the merger or consolidation had not taken place, or the surviving or new corporation may be substituted in its place; neither the rights of creditors nor liens upon the property of a merging or consolidating corporation are impaired by the merger or consolidation;

in the case of a merger, the articles of incorporation of the surviving corporation are amended to the extent that changes in its articles of incorporation are stated in the plan of merger; in the case of a consolidation, the statements set out in the articles of consolidation which are required or permitted to be set out in the articles of incorporation of corporations organized under this chapter are the original articles of incorporation of the new corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.266.
Merger or consolidation of domestic and foreign corporations.

One or more foreign corporations and one or more domestic corporations may be merged or consolidated in the manner provided in AS

10.20.271

and

10.20.275

if the merger or consolidation is permitted by the laws of the state under which each foreign corporation is organized.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.271.
Law applicable when domestic and foreign corporations merge or consolidate.

Each domestic corporation shall comply with the provisions of this chapter with respect to the merger or consolidation of domestic corporations and each foreign corporation shall comply with the applicable provisions of the laws of the state under which it is organized.

If the surviving or new corporation is to be governed by the laws of a state other than this state, it shall comply with the provisions of this chapter with respect to foreign corporations if it is to transact business in this state and in every case it shall file with the commissioner

an agreement that it may be served with process in this state in a proceeding for the enforcement of an obligation of a domestic corporation which is a party to the merger or consolidation;

an irrevocable appointment of the commissioner as its agent to accept service of process in these proceedings.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.275.
Effect of merger or consolidation of foreign and domestic corporations.

If the surviving or new corporation is to be governed by the law of this state, the effect of the merger or consolidation is the same as the merger or consolidation of domestic corporations.
If the surviving or new corporation is to be governed by the laws of another state, the effect of the merger or consolidation is the same as the merger or consolidation of domestic corporations except insofar as the laws of the other state provide otherwise.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.280.
Sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, or other disposition of assets.

A sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, the property and assets of a corporation may be made upon such terms and conditions and for such consideration, which may consist in whole or in part of money or property, real or personal, including shares of any corporation for profit, domestic or foreign, as may be authorized in the manner set out in this section.

If there are members entitled to vote, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending the sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, or other disposition and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written notice stating that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, or other disposition of all or substantially all, the property and assets of the corporation shall be given to each member entitled to vote at the meeting, within the time and in the manner provided by this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of members. At the meeting the members may authorize the sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, or other disposition and may fix, or may authorize the board of directors to fix, the terms and conditions thereof and the consideration to be received by the corporation therefor. This authorization shall require at least two-thirds of the votes which members present at the meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast. After authorization by a vote of members, the board of directors may abandon the sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, or other disposition of assets, subject to the rights of third parties under related contracts, without further action or approval by members.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote, a sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, the property and assets of a corporation shall be authorized upon receiving the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, this section was reorganized to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes. The former introductory material was designated as subsection (a) and minor word changes were made to reflect the reorganization. Former paragraphs (1) and (2) were redesignated as subsections (b) and (c) respectively.

Sec. 10.20.285.
Other transactions.

Under AS 10.55 (Alaska Entity Transactions Act), a corporation may enter into mergers, interest exchanges, conversions, and domestications that are not covered by AS

10.20.216

—

10.20.280

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 32, ch. 60, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts, this section does not affect an action or proceeding begun or right accrued before July 1, 2014.